Maine, session 132, LD2220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §10314 is enacted to read:
§10314. Maine Home Energy Navigator and Coaching Resource Hub
The Maine Home Energy Navigator and Coaching Resource Hub, referred to in this
section as "the resource hub," is established within the department to promote community-
based energy coaching services to residential consumers that provide guidance, particularly
to those in low-income, rural and underserved communities, to understand and navigate
energy efficiency and clean energy investment options to affordably meet their home
energy needs. Through the resource hub, the department shall make available standardized
training curricula and program materials that may be used by communities to implement
their own energy coaching programs. The department, as funding allows, shall administer
the resource hub.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENERGY RESOURCES, DEPARTMENT OF
Department of Energy Resources Z424
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the development and maintenance of standardized
training curriculum and program materials for the Maine Home Energy Navigator and
Coaching Resource Hub.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $100,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $100,000
Page 1 - 132LR3060(03)